Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-415
Safety codes; validity or reasonableness; appeal to Commissioner of Labor.

Any person in interest, or his duly authorized agent, may file a petition with the Commissioner of Labor for a review of the validity or reasonableness of any code, order, rule or standard made under the provisions of section 48-412. The commissioner shall, as soon as practicable thereafter, hold a hearing to determine the issues raised, and shall give ample notice of the time and place of such hearing to the petitioner, and to such other interested persons as the commissioner may determine.

Laws 1929, c. 138, § 1, p. 493;

C.S.1929, § 48-412;

R.S.1943, § 48-415;

Laws 1969, c. 400, § 4, p. 1392.